Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No county or municipality shall be held liable in a civil
lawsuit for damages resulting from a data breach or cybersecurity
incident if, at the time of the breach or incident, the county or
municipality had adopted and reasonably conformed its practices to
one or more of the following frameworks:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4132 Page 1

1. The National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)
Cybersecurity Framework;
2. The Center for Internet Security (CIS) Critical Security
Controls; or
3. The ISO/IEC 27000 series of information security standards.
B. To qualify for safe harbor under this section, a county or
municipality shall:
1. Complete and submit an annual self-certification by the
county or municipality information technology officer or designee to
the governing body of the county or municipality affirming
conformity to the selected framework;
2. Maintain documentation and records demonstrating
implementation of cybersecurity practices, including, but not
limited to, policies, asset inventories, multifactor authentication,
patching, backups, employee training, incident response, business
continuity, and disaster recovery plans; and
3. Obtain an independent review by a qualified external
assessor not less than once every three (3) years, with the
resulting report to be retained by the county or municipality and
deemed confidential pursuant to the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
C. A county or municipality may voluntarily submit summary
information regarding its self-certification or independent review
to the State Auditor and Inspector for the purpose of statewide
benchmarking and education.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4132 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 17th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate















ENGR. H. B. NO. 4132 Page 3